Washington statutes.
RCW 18.17.140

Binding effect of compact and other laws.

(1) A licensee providing professional counseling services in a remote state under the privilege to practice shall adhere to the laws and regulations, including scope of practice, of the remote state.

(2) Nothing herein prevents enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the compact.

(3) Any laws in a member state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

(4) Any lawful actions of the commission, including all rules and bylaws properly promulgated by the commission, are binding upon the member states.

(5) All permissible agreements between the commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.

(6) In the event any provision of the compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.

[ 2023 c 58 s 15.]